Washington statutes.
RCW 11.68.021

Hearing on petition for nonintervention powers.

A hearing on a petition for nonintervention powers may be held at the time of the appointment of the personal representative or at any later time.

[ 1997 c 252 s 60.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.